Washington statutes.
RCW 36.78.090

Certificates of good practice—Withholding of motor vehicle tax distribution.

(1) Before May 1st of each year the board shall transmit to the state treasurer certificates of good practice on behalf of the counties which during the preceding calendar year:

(a) Have submitted to the state department of transportation or to the board all reports required by law or regulation of the board; and

(b) Have reasonably complied with provisions of law relating to county road administration and with the standards of good practice as formulated and adopted by the board.

(2) The board shall not transmit to the state treasurer a certificate of good practice on behalf of any county failing to meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, but the board shall in such case and before May 1st, notify the county and the state treasurer of its reasons for withholding the certificate.

(3) The state treasurer, upon receiving a notice that a certificate of good practice will not be issued on behalf of a county, or that a previously issued certificate of good practice has been revoked, shall, effective the first day of the month after that in which notice is received, withhold from such county its share of motor vehicle fuel taxes distributable pursuant to RCW 46.68.120 until the board thereafter issues on behalf of such county a certificate of good practice or a conditional certificate. After withholding or revoking a certificate of good practice with respect to any county, the board may thereafter at any time issue such a certificate or a conditional certificate when the board is satisfied that the county has complied or is diligently attempting to comply with the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

(4) The board may, upon notice and a hearing, revoke a previously issued certificate of good practice or substitute a conditional certificate therefor when, after issuance of a certificate of good practice, any county fails to meet the requirements of subsection (1) (a) and (b) of this section, but the board shall in such case notify the county and the state treasurer of its reasons for the revocation or substitution.

(5) Motor vehicle fuel taxes withheld from any county pursuant to this section shall not be distributed to any other county, but shall be retained in the motor vehicle fund to the credit of the county originally entitled thereto. Whenever the state treasurer receives from the board a certificate of good practice issued on behalf of such county he or she shall distribute to such county all of the funds theretofore retained in the motor vehicle fund to the credit of such county.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4127; 1984 c 7 s 33; 1977 ex.s. c 257 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 120 s 9.]